District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Empowering Parents in CFSA Investigations Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 104(c)(3) of the Prevention of Child Abuse and Neglect Act of 1977,
effective September 23, 1977 (D.C. Law 2-22; D.C. Official Code § 4-1301.04(c)(3)), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subparagraph (B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) Conducting an interview with the child’s caretaker or caretakers, during
which time the Agency shall inform the caretaker of their right to counsel pursuant to D.C.
Official Code § 16-2304(b)(1), legal resources available to the caretaker, and the availability of
the Ombudsperson for Children as a resource to receive complaints pursuant to section 104 of
the Office of the Ombudsperson for Children Establishment Amendment Act of 2020, effective
April 5, 2021 (D.C. law 23-270; D.C. Official Code § 4–671.04).”.
(b) Subparagraph (F) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(c) Subparagraph (G) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and”
in its place.
(d) A new subparagraph (H) is added to read as follows:
“(H) Written notification of legal resources available to the child’s reported
caretaker or caretakers at the initiation of the investigation process.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2